North Carolina, session 2025, HB1021.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Military and Veterans Affairs the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to establish and administer a grant program to eligible
nonprofit Disabled American Veterans (DAV) chapters to (i) renovate and expand their facilities
and (ii) provide additional resources to disabled veterans. Each chapter may be awarded only one
grant in each fiscal year, which shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).
SECTION 1.(b) In awarding grants under this section, the Department shall, to the
extent possible, select applicants from all parts of the State. Grants shall be made as soon as
practicable. If, in any fiscal year, the Department has not disbursed all of the grant funds
appropriated for the grant program as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the Department
shall allow applicants who have not received grant funds in that fiscal year to apply for a grant.
Any funds appropriated for the grant program authorized by subsection (a) of this section that
are unencumbered at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall
remain available for providing grants as authorized by this section.
SECTION 1.(c) Report. – By July 1, 2027, and each July of every even-numbered
year, the Department shall submit a written report on the grants allocated in subsection (a) of this
section to the Senate Appropriations Committee on General Government and Information
Technology, the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on General Government,
and the Fiscal Research Division, which shall include all of the following:
(1) The total number of grants awarded, by county.
(2) The name of each eligible DAV chapter to which a grant was awarded, by
county.
(3) The amount of the grant awarded to each DAV chapter.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1021-v-1*